Hawaii statutes.
§806D-1 Definitions. Whenever used in
this chapter, unless otherwise apparent from the context:

"Adverse result" includes one or more
of the following possible consequences:

(1) Danger to the life or physical safety of an
individual;

(2) A flight from prosecution;

(3) The destruction of, potential loss of, or
tampering with evidence;

(4) The intimidation of potential witnesses; or

(5) Jeopardy to an investigation or undue delay of a
trial.

"Applicant" means a law enforcement
officer, prosecuting attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney, attorney general
or deputy attorney general, or defense attorney who is seeking criminal process
under section 806D-2.

"Criminal process" means a search
warrant or legal process issued pursuant to chapters 28, 621, 622, and 803; the
Hawaii rules of penal procedure; and any other legal process signed by a judge
or clerk of the district or circuit court and issued in a criminal matter that
allows the search for or commands production of records that are in the actual
or constructive possession of the recipient, regardless of whether the
recipient or the records are physically located within the State.

"Defense attorney" means an attorney
of record for a person charged with a crime, when such attorney is seeking the
issuance of criminal process for the defense of the criminal case.

"Properly served" means delivery by
hand or in a manner reasonably allowing for proof of delivery if delivered by
United States mail, overnight delivery service, or facsimile to the recipient
addressee of criminal process.

"Recipient" means a person, as
defined in section 701-118, or a business, as defined in section 487J-1, that
has conducted business or engaged in transactions or activities occurring at
least in part in the state from which process was issued upon whom process is
properly served. [L 2012, c 325, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 219, §1; am L 2016, c
160, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next